Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 18.70.900.
Definition of building.

In this chapter, “building” means a structure, installation, facility, or edifice erected or in the process of being erected and that is used or intended for use as a commercial, industrial, business, institutional, other public building, or residential building containing four or more dwelling units.

History.

(§ 4 ch 176 SLA 1968; am § 27 ch 32 SLA 1971)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 18.70.165. Renumbered as AS

18.70.300

in 1968. Renumbered again in 1991.